Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1904
Continuing care retirement community,
defined.

Continuing
care retirement community means an operational entity or related organization
which, under a life care contract, provides a continuum of services, including,
but not limited to, independent living, assisted-living, nursing facility,
and skilled nursing facility services within the same or a contiguous municipality
as defined in section 18-2410.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 4.